Washington statutes.
RCW 36.36.045

Lien for delinquent fees.

The county shall have a lien for any delinquent fees imposed for the withdrawal of subterranean water or on-site sewage disposal, which shall attach to the property to which the fees were imposed, if the following conditions are met:

(1) At least eighteen months have passed since the first billing for a delinquent fee installment; and

(2) At least three billing notices and a letter have been mailed to the property owner, within the period specified in subsection (1) of this section, explaining that a lien may be imposed for any delinquent fee installment that has not been paid in that period.

The lien shall otherwise be subject to the provisions of chapter 36.94 RCW related to liens for delinquent charges. The county shall record liens for any delinquent fees in the office of the county auditor. Failure on the part of the county to record the lien does not affect the validity of the lien.

[ 1997 c 393 s 6; 1987 c 381 s 2.]